Hawaii statutes.
§323F-10.6 Peer review and
credentialing. Peer review activities shall be subject to chapters 663 and
671D and all other provisions and restrictions of medical peer review
committees established by state law. [L 1998, c 229, pt of §1; am L 2007, c
290, §28]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next